Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.060

Name of firm—When special partner liable as general partner.

The business of the partnership may be conducted under a name in which the names of the general partners only shall be inserted, without the addition of the word "company" or any other general term. If the name of any special partner is used in such firm with his or her consent or privity, he or she shall be deemed and treated as a general partner, or if he or she personally makes any contract respecting the concerns of the partnership with any person except the general partners, he or she shall be deemed and treated as a general partner in relation to such contract, unless he or she makes it appear that in making such contract he or she acted and was recognized as a special partner only.

[ 2011 c 336 s 683; 1955 c 15 s 25.12.060. Prior: 1869 p 381 s 6; RRS s 9971.]